dictsource/he_rules
.group צ
    צ   (L10   ts
    צ   (_    =ts
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) צ   (_    ts
 L94) צ   (_    ts
    צַ   (L10   tsa
    צַ   (_    tsa
    צּ   (L10   ts
    צּ   (_    =ts
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) צּ   (_    ts
 L94) צּ   (_    ts
    צַּ   (L10   tsa
    צַּ   (_    tsa
    צֻ   (L10   tsu
    צֻ   (_    tsu
    צֻּ   (L10   tsu
    צֻּ   (_    tsu
    צָּ   (L61   tso
    צָּ   (L10   tsa
    צָּ   (_    tsa
    צֵ   (L10   tse
    צֵ   (_    tse
    צֶ   (L10   tse
    צֶ   (_    tse
 L56) צֶ   (L42_  =tse
    צֶּ   (L10   tse
    צֶּ   (_    tse
 L56) צֶּ   (L42_  =tse
    צֵּ   (L10   tse
    צֵּ   (_    tse
    צְ   (L10   ts
    צְ   (_    ts
    צְּ   (L10   ts
    צְּ   (_    ts
    צִ   (L10   tsi
    צִ   (_    tsi
    צִּ   (L10   tsi
    צִּ   (_    tsi
    צֹּ   (L10   tso
    צֹּ   (_    tso
    צֹ   (L10   tso
    צֹ   (_    tso
    צי   (L10   tsi
    צי   (_    tsi
    צׇ   (L10   tso
    צׇ   (_    tso
    צׇּ   (L10   tso
    צׇּ   (_    tso
    צָ   (L61   tso
    צָ   (L10   tsa
    צָ   (_    tsa
    צ'   (L10   tS
    צ'   (_    tS
    צְ'   (_    tS
    צַ'   (L10   tSa
    צַ'   (_    tSa
    צַּ'   (L10   tSa
    צַּ'   (_    tSa
    צֵ'   (L10   tSe
    צֵ'   (_    tSe
    צֶ'   (L10   tSe
    צֶ'   (_    tSe
 L56) צֶ'   (L42_  =tSe
    צֵּ'   (L10   tS'e
    צֶּ'   (_    tS'e
    צֶּ'   (L10   tS'e
 L56) צֶּ'   (L42_  =tSe
    צֵּ'   (_    tS'e
    צְ'   (L10   tS
    צְ'   (_    tS
    צִ'   (L10   tSi
    צִ'   (_    tSi
    צ'י   (L10   tSi
    צ'י   (_    tSi
    צׇ'   (L10   tSo
    צׇ'   (_    tSo
    צׇּ'   (L10   tSo
    צׇּ'   (_    tSo
    צָ'   (L61   tSo
    צָ'   (L10   tSa
    צָ'   (_    tSa
    צ'ה   (L10   tSa
    צ'ה   (_    tSa
    צֻ'   (L10   tsu
    צֻ'   (_    tsu
    צֻּ'   (L10   tsu
    צֻּ'   (_    tsu
 _) צְ   (L11   tse
 _) צְּ   (L11   tse
 _) צְ'   (L11   tSe
    צְ   (L38   tse
    צְּ   (L38   tse
    צְ'   (L38   tSe
 L55) צְ   (L10   tse
 L55) צְּ   (L10   tse
 L55) צְ'   (L10   tSe
    צֳ   (L10   tso
    צֳ   (_   tso
    צֳּ   (L10   tso
    צֳּ   (_   tso
    צֳ'   (L10   tSo
    צֳ'   (_   tSo
 _L13) צְ   (L10   ts
 _L13) צְּ   (L10   ts
 _L13) צְ'   (L10   tS

.group ץ
    ץ   (L10   ts
    ץ   (_    =ts
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) ץ   (_    ts
 L94) ץ   (_    ts
    ץ'   (L10   tS
    ץ'   (_    =tS
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) ץ'   (_    tS
 L94) ץ'   (_    tS

.group ק
    ק   (L10   k
    ק   (_    =k
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) ק   (_    k
 L94) ק   (_    k
    קְּ   (L10   k
    קְּ   (_    k
    קּ   (L10   k
    קּ   (_    =k
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) קּ   (_    k
 L94) קּ   (_    k
    קַ   (L10   ka
    קַ   (_    ka
    קָּ   (L61   ko
    קָּ   (L10   ka
    קָּ   (_    ka
    קַּ   (L10   ka
    קַּ   (_    ka
    קֵ   (L10   ke
    קֵ   (_    ke
    קֶ   (L10   ke
    קֶ   (_    ke
 L56) קֶ   (L42_  =ke
    קֶּ   (L10   ke
    קֶּ   (_    ke
 L56) קֶּ   (L42_  =ke
    קֵּ   (L10   ke
    קֵּ   (_    ke
    קְ   (L10   k
    קְ   (_    k
    קִ   (L10   ki
    קִ   (_    ki
    קִּ   (L10   ki
    קִּ   (_    ki
    קי   (L10   ki
    קי   (_    ki
    קֻ   (L10   ku
    קֻ   (_    ku
    קֻּ   (L10   ku
    קֻּ   (_    ku
    קׇ   (L10   ko
    קׇ   (_    ko
    קׇּ   (L10   ko
    קׇּ   (_    ko
    קֹ   (L10   ko
    קֹ   (_    ko
    קֹּ   (L10   ko
    קֹּ   (_    ko
    קָ   (L61   ko
 _) קָ   (L24L59L41   ko
    קָ   (L10   ka
    קָ   (_    k'a
    קה   (L10   ka
    קה   (_    ka
 _) קְּ   (L11   ke
 _) קְ   (L11   ke
    קְּ   (L39   ke
    קְ   (L39   ke
    קְּ   (L31L60   ke
    קְ   (L31L60   ke
 L55) קְּ   (L10   ke
 L55) קְ   (L10   ke
    קֳּ   (L10   ko
    קֳּ   (_   ko
    קֳ   (L10   ko
    קֳ   (_   ko
 _L13) קְּ   (L10   k
 _L13) קְ   (L10   k

.group ר
    ר   (L10   R
    ר   (_    =R
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) ר   (_    R
 L94) ר   (_    R
    רַ   (L10   Ra
    רַ   (_    R'a
    רֵ   (L10   Re
    רֵ   (_    R'e
    רֶ   (L10   Re
    רֶ   (_    Re
 L56) רֶ   (L42_  =Re
    רְ   (L10   R
    רְ   (_    R
    רִ   (L10   Ri
    רִ   (_    Ri
    רֹ   (L10   Ro
    רֹ   (_    Ro
    רי   (L10   Ri
    רי   (_    Ri
    רֻ   (L10   Ru
    רֻ   (_    Ru
    רׇ   (L10   Ro
    רׇ   (_    Ro
    רׇּ   (L10   Ro
    רׇּ   (_    Ro
    רָ   (L61   Ro
    רָ   (L10   Ra
    רָ   (_    =Ra
    רה   (L10   Ra
    רה   (_    Ra
 _) רְ   (L10   Re
    רְ   (L40   Re
 L55) רְ   (L10   Re
    רֳ   (L10   Ro
    רֳ   (_   Ro
 _L13) רְ   (L10   R

.group ש
    ש   (L10   S
    ש   (_    =S
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) ש   (_    S
 L94) ש   (_    S
    שׁ   (L10   S
    שׁ   (_    =S
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) שׁ   (_    S
 L94) שׁ   (_    S
    שּׁ   (L10   S
    שּׁ   (_    =S
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) שּׁ   (_    S
 L94) שּׁ   (_    S
    שְּׁ   (L10   S
    שְּׁ   (_    S
    שַּׁ   (L10   Sa
    שַּׁ   (_    Sa
    שַׁ   (L10   Sa
    שַׁ   (_    Sa
    שָּׁ   (L61   So
    שָּׁ   (L10   Sa
    שָּׁ   (_    Sa
    שֵׁ   (L10   Se
    שֵׁ   (_    Se
    שֶּׁ   (L10   Se
    שֶּׁ   (_    Se
 L56) שֶּׁ   (L42_  =Se
    שֵּׁ   (L10   Se
    שֵּׁ   (_    Se
 _) שֶׁ   (L15L60P3   Se
 _) שֶׁ   (L16L20P3   Se
    שֶׁ   (L10   Se
    שֶׁ   (_    Se
 L56) שֶׁ   (L42_  =Se
    שְׁ   (L10   S
    שְׁ   (_    S
    שִׁ   (L10   Si
    שִׁ   (_    Si
    שִּׁ   (L10   Si
    שִּׁ   (_    Si
    שֹׁ   (L10   So
    שֹׁ   (_    So
    שֹּׁ   (L10   So
    שֹּׁ   (_    So
    שֹׂ   (L10   so
    שֹׂ   (_    so
    שֹּׂ   (L10   so
    שֹּׂ   (_    so
    שׁי   (L10   Si
    שׁי   (_    Si
    שֻׁ   (L10   Su
    שֻׁ   (_    Su
    שׇׁ   (L10   So
    שׇׁ   (_    So
    שׇּׁ   (L10   So
    שׇּׁ   (_    So
    שָׁ   (L61   So
// Special case for שָׁרָשִׁים
 _) שָׁ   (L40L59L41   So
    שָׁ   (L10   Sa
    שָׁ   (_    Sa
    שַׁ   (L10   Sa
    שַׁ   (_    Sa
    שׂ   (L10   s
    שׂ   (_    =s
    שּׂ   (L10   s
    שּׂ   (_    =s
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) שׂ   (_    s
 L94) שׂ   (_    s
    שְּׂ   (L10   s
    שְּׂ   (_    s
    שַׂ   (L10   sa
    שַׂ   (_    sa
    שַּׂ   (L10   sa
    שַּׂ   (_    sa
    שָּׂ   (L61   so
    שָּׂ   (L10   sa
    שָּׂ   (_    sa
    שֵׂ   (L10   se
    שֵׂ   (_    se
    שֶׂ   (L10   se
    שֶׂ   (_    se
    שֶּׂ   (L10   se
    שֶּׂ   (_    se
 L56) שֶׂ   (L42_  =se
    שֵּׂ   (L10   se
    שֵּׂ   (_    se
    שְׂ   (L10   s
    שְׂ   (_    s
    שֻׂ   (L10   su
    שֻׂ   (_    su
    שִׂ   (L10   si
    שִׂ   (_    si
    שִּׂ   (L10   si
    שִּׂ   (_    si
    שׂי   (L10   si
    שׂי   (_    si
    שׇׂ   (L10   so
    שׇׂ   (_    so
    שׇּׂ   (L10   so
    שׇּׂ   (_    so
    שָׂ   (L61   so
    שָׂ   (L10   sa
    שָׂ   (_    sa
 _) שְּׁ   (L11   Se
 _) שְׁ   (L11   Se
 _) שְּׂ   (L11   se
 _) שְׂ   (L11   se
    שְּׁ   (L41   Se
    שְׁ   (L41   Se
    שְּׂ   (L41   se
    שְׂ   (L41   se
 _) שֶׁבְּ   (L10P6   Sebe
 L55) שְּׁ   (L10   Se
 L55) שְׁ   (L10   Se
 L55) שְּׂ   (L10   se
 L55) שְׂ   (L10   se
    שֳּׁ   (L10   So
    שֳּׁ   (_   So
    שֳׁ   (L10   So
    שֳׁ   (_   So
    שֳּׂ   (L10   so
    שֳּׂ   (_   so
    שֳׂ   (L10   so
    שֳׂ   (_   so
 _L13) שְּׁ   (L10   S
 _L13) שְׁ   (L10   S
 _L13) שְּׂ   (L10   s
 _L13) שְׂ   (L10   s

.group ת
    ת   (L10   t
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) ת   (_    t
 L94) ת   (_    t
 L66L66) ת   (_    t
 L93L55) ת   (_    t
    ת   (_    =t
    תְּ   (L10   t
    תְּ   (_    =t
 L93L55) תְּ   (_    t
    תַ   (L10   ta
    תַ   (_    ta
    תָּ   (L61   to
    תָּ   (L10   ta
 // hataya - הִפְעַלְתָּ
 _L68L13L66L13) תָּ   (_S2t    a
 // hataya - הֻפְעַלְתָּ
 _L72L13L66L13) תָּ   (_S2t    a
 // hataya - נִפְעַלְתָּ
 _L74L13L66L13) תָּ   (_S2t    a
 // hataya - פָּעַלְתָּ
 _L64L66L13) תָּ   (_S2t    a
 // hataya - יָכֹלְתָּ
 _L64L77L13) תָּ   (_S2t    a
 // hataya - יָכוֹלְתָּ
 _L64L79L13) תָּ   (_S2t    a
 // hataya - פִּעַלְתָּ
 _L65L66L13) תָּ   (_S2t    a
 // hataya - פִּיעַלְתָּ
 _L65L30L66L13) תָּ   (_S2t    a
 // hataya - סֻפַּרְתָּ
 _L81L66L13) תָּ   (_S2t    a
 // hataya - סוּפַּרְתָּ
 _L82L66L13) תָּ   (_S2t    a
 // hataya - הִתְפַּעַלְתָּ
 _L68L84L66L66L13) תָּ   (_S2t    a
    תָּ   (_    t'a
    תַּ   (L10   ta
    תַּ   (_    ta
    תֵ   (L10   te
    תֵ   (_    te
    תֶ   (L10   te
    תֶ   (_    te
 L56) תֶ   (L42_  =te
    תֵּ   (L10   te
    תֵּ   (_    te
    תֶּם   (_S3t   em
    תֶּן   (_S3t   en
 // hataya - פְּעַלְתֶּם
 _L13L66L13) תֶּם   (_   t'em
 // hataya - פְּעַלְתֶּן
 _L13L66L13) תֶּן   (_   t'en
// // hataya - נִפְעַלְתֶּם
// _L74L13L66L13) תֶּם   (_S3t   em
// // hataya - נִפְעַלְתֶּן
// _L74L13L66L13) תֶּן   (_S3t   en
    תֶּ   (L10   te
    תֶּ   (_    te
 L56) תֶּ   (L42_  =te
    תְ   (L10   t
    תְ   (_    =t
    תִ   (L10   ti
    תִ   (_    ti
 // hataya - הִפְעַלְתִּי
 _L68L13L66L13) תִּי   (_S3t i
 // hataya - הֻפְעַלְתִּי
 _L72L13L66L13) תִּי   (_S3t i
 // hataya - פָּעַלְתִּי
 _L64L66L13) תִּי   (_S3t i
 // hataya - יָכֹלְתִּי
 _L64L77L13) תִּי   (_S3t i
 // hataya - יָכוֹלְתִּי
 _L64L79L13) תִּי   (_S3t i
 // hataya - פִּעַלְתִּי
 _L65L66L13) תִּי   (_S3t i
 // hataya - פִּיעַלְתִּי
 _L65L30L66L13) תִּי   (_S3t i
 // hataya - סֻפַּרְתִּי
 _L81L66L13) תִּי   (_S3t i
 // hataya - סוּפַּרְתִּי
 _L82L66L13) תִּי   (_S3t i
 // hataya - הִתְפַּעַלְתִּי
 _L68L84L66L66L13) תִּי   (_S3t i
 // hataya - (קַטֶּלֶת) קַטַּלְתִּי
 _L66L66L13) תִּי   (_S3t i
 // hataya - נִפְעַלְתִּי
 _L74L13L66L13) תִּי   (_S3t i
    תִּ   (L10   ti
    תִּ   (_    ti
    תי   (L10   ti
    תי   (_    ti
    תֻ   (L10   tu
    תֻ   (_    tu
    תֻּ   (L10   tu
    תֻּ   (_    tu
    תׇ   (L10   to
    תׇ   (_    to
    תׇּ   (L10   to
    תׇּ   (_    to
    תֹּ   (L10   to
    תֹּ   (_    to
    תֹ   (L10   to
    תֹ   (_    to
    תָ   (L61   to
    תָ   (L10   ta
    תָ   (_    t'a
    תּ   (L10   t
    תּ   (_    =t
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) תּ   (_    t
 L94) תּ   (_    t
    ת'   (L10   T
    ת'   (_    =T
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) ת'   (_    T
 L94) ת'   (_    T
    תַ'   (L10   Ta
    תַ'   (_    Ta
    תֵ'   (L10   Te
    תֵ'   (_    Te
    תֻ'   (L10   Tu
    תֻ'   (_    Tu
    תֶ'   (L10   Te
    תֶ'   (_    Te
 L56) תֶ'   (L42_  =Te
    תְ'   (L10   T
    תְ'   (_    T
    תִ'   (L10   Ti
    תִ'   (_    Ti
    ת'י   (L10   Ti
    ת'י   (_    Ti
    תׇ'   (L10   To
    תׇ'   (_    To
    תָ'   (L61   To
    תָ'   (L10   Ta
    תָ'   (_    Ta
    תּ'   (L10   T
    תּ'   (_    T
    תַּ'   (L10   Ta
    תַּ'   (_    Ta
    תֵּ'   (L10   Te
    תֵּ'   (_    Te
    תֶּ'   (L10   Te
    תֶּ'   (_    Te
 L56) תֶּ'   (L42_  =Te
    תְּ'   (L10   T
    תְּ'   (_    T
    תִּ'   (L10   Ti
    תִּ'   (_    Ti
    תּ'י   (L10   Ti
    תּ'י   (_    Ti
    תׇּ'   (L10   To
    תׇּ'   (_    To
    תָּ'   (L61   To
    תָּ'   (L10   Ta
    תָּ'   (_    T'a
    תה   (L10   ta
    תה   (_    ta
 _) תְּ   (L11   te
 _) תְ   (L11   te
 _) תְ'   (L11   Te
 _) תְּ'   (L11   Te
    תְּ   (L24   te
    תְ   (L24   te
    תְּ   (L38   te
    תְ   (L38   te
    תְּ   (L29   te
    תְ   (L29   te
    תְּ   (L42   te
    תְ   (L42   te
    תְ'   (L42   Te
    תְּ'   (L42   Te
 L55) תְּ   (L10   te
 L55) תְ   (L10   te
 L55) תְ'   (L10   Te
 L55) תְּ'   (L10   Te
    תֳּ   (L10   to
    תֳּ   (_   to
    תֳ   (L10   to
    תֳ   (_   to
    תֳ'   (L10   To
    תֳ'   (_   To
    תֳּ'   (L10   To
    תֳּ'   (_   To
 _L13) תְּ   (L10   t
 _L13) תְ   (L10   t
 _L13) תְ'   (L10   T
 _L13) תְּ'   (L10   T


// rules for Hebrew written by English characters
// Sometimes, Hebrew involve English characters


.group a
	a	_^_en
	?1 a	a
	// ?1 a ('	A


.group aa
	aa	_^_en
	//?1 aa	A


.group b
	b	_^_en
    ?1 b	b


.group c
	c	_^_en
	?1 c (e	s
	?1 c (y	s
	?1 c (i	s
	?1 c	k


.group ch
	ch	_^_en
	?1 ch	tS


.group d
	d	_^_en
	?1 d	d


.group e
	e	_^_en
	?1 e	e


.group ee
	ee	_^_en
	?1 ee	i


.group f
	f	_^_en
	?1 f	f


.group g
	g	_^_en
	?1 g	g


.group gh
	gh	_^_en
	?1 gh	q1


.group h
	h	_^_en
	?1 h	h


.group i
	i	_^_en
	?1 i	i


.group j
	j	_^_en
	?1 j	dZ


.group jh
	jh	_^_en
	?1 jh	Z


.group k
	k	_^_en
	?1 k	k


.group kh
	kh	_^_en
	?1 kh	x


.group l
	l	_^_en
	?1 l	l
